Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.277] TERMINATING THE TENANCY; JUST CAUSE REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Just cause required. new text end new text begin A landlord must not issue a notice terminating a tenancy or refuse to renew a lease unless the landlord establishes one or more of the grounds for termination described in subdivisions 2 to 10. The landlord must provide the tenant with sufficient written notice consistent with the lease requirements but not less than a full rental period or in compliance with section 504B.135, describing the reason for terminating the tenancy. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Nonpayment of rent. new text end new text begin The tenant fails to cure the deficiency after receiving a nonpayment notice from the landlord, and the landlord does not pursue a valid nonpayment eviction action under section 504B.291, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), but decides to terminate the tenancy at the end of the lease. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Repeated late payment of rent. new text end new text begin The tenant repeatedly makes late payments of rent, at least five times in a 12-month period. The landlord must provide the tenant with notice following a late payment that a subsequent late payment may be grounds for termination of the tenancy. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Material breach. new text end new text begin After receiving a written notice from the landlord, the tenant fails to stop the action that is a material breach of the lease or fails to take action that would cure the deficiency. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Refusal to renew. new text end new text begin The tenant refuses to renew or extend the lease after the landlord requests in writing that the tenant renew or extend the lease. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Occupancy by landlord or family member. new text end new text begin The landlord, in good faith, seeks to recover possession of the rental unit so that the landlord or a family member may occupy the unit as the landlord's or the family member's principal residence. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Withdrawal from market; building demolishment and dwelling unit conversion. new text end new text begin (a) The landlord seeks to withdraw the rental property from the residential rental market for the following reasons: new text end new text begin (1) to demolish the property; convert the property into a cooperative, provided the landlord complies with the provisions of chapter 515B; or convert the property into a nonresidential use, provided the landlord obtains the necessary permits before terminating the tenancy; new text end new text begin (2) to, in good faith, recover the unit to sell it in accordance with a condominium conversion, provided the landlord complies with the provisions of chapter 515B; or new text end new text begin (3) to convert the unit into a subsidized unit under a local, state, or federal housing program and the tenant does not qualify to rent the unit under that program. new text end new text begin (b) A landlord who wishes to withdraw a rental property must: new text end new text begin (1) file a notice of intent to withdraw with the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency; new text end new text begin (2) provide tenants with 180-day notice prior to the termination of the tenancy; and new text end new text begin (3) provide one month's rent as a relocation fee to the tenant 30 days prior to withdrawal. new text end new text begin (c) If the landlord offers units for rent in the withdrawn rental property within five years following the withdrawal, the commissioner, the attorney general, or a tenant that was removed from the rental property may sue for damages and attorney fees on behalf of removed residents. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Rehabilitation and renovation. new text end new text begin The landlord seeks, in good faith, to recover possession of the dwelling unit to complete rehabilitation or renovation work that would render the unit uninhabitable for the duration of the rehabilitation or renovation. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Complying with government order to vacate. new text end new text begin The landlord is complying with a government agency's order to vacate, order to abate, or any other order that necessitates vacating the dwelling unit. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Occupancy conditioned on employment. new text end new text begin The tenant's occupancy in the dwelling unit is conditioned upon employment on the rental property and the employment relationship is terminated. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Lease amendments. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section alters the landlord and tenant's ability to amend the terms of a lease as otherwise allowed by law. new text end